Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-218
Mayor; general powers and duties.

The mayor shall, in a general way, constantly investigate all public affairs concerning the interest of the city, and shall investigate and ascertain in a general way the efficiency and manner in which all departments of the city government are being conducted. He shall recommend to the city council all such matters as in his judgment should receive the investigation, consideration or action of that body.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. II, § 17, p. 430;

C.S.1922, § 3543;

C.S.1929, § 14-218;

R.S.1943, § 14-218.